District of Columbia statutes.
22-1009

Keeping or using place for fighting or baiting of fowls or animals; arrest without warrant.

Any person or persons who shall keep or use, or in any way be connected with or interested in the management of, or shall receive money for the admission of any person to any place kept or used for the purpose of fighting or baiting of fowls or animals, may be arrested without a warrant, as provided in § 44-1505, and for every such offense be punished in the same manner provided in § 22-1001.

Aug. 23, 1871, Leg. Assem., p. 137, ch. 106, § 9

History

1981 Ed., § 22-809.
1973 Ed., § 22-809.

Prior Codifications